Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 12
ASBESTOS SAFETY

Sec.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1996, p. 238,

§

1, effective April 1, 1996, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 12-12-1 through 12-12-26 and was based on Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157,

§

1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3,

§

12; Ga. L. 1987, p. 964,

§

1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 285,

§

1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6,

§

12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91,

§

12.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Asbestos removal and encapsulation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-14.

12-12-1. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Asbestos Safety Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-2. Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public health, safety, and environment of the people of this state by authorizing the Board of Natural Resources to adopt, administer, and enforce a program for licensing contractors and for requiring training for asbestos supervisors, and by managing the removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing materials from facilities and residential dwellings in the safest manner possible. This chapter establishes a program of contractor licensing and a program of notification, fees, and certification for asbestos removal or encapsulation projects to be administered by the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-3. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Asbestos" means any naturally occurring hydrated mineral silicates separable into commercially used fibers, specifically the asbestiform varieties of serpentine, chrysotile; cummingtomite-grunerite; amosite; riebeckite, crocidolite; anthophyllite; tremolite; and actinolite.

"Asbestos supervisor" means any individual who is employed or engaged by a contractor to supervise the removal, encapsulation, cleaning, or disposal of friable asbestos-containing materials.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Contractor" means any person who contracts with an owner or operator of a facility or residential dwelling to perform the removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing material from any such facility or residential dwelling. Such term shall not include any employee of such owner or operator.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources or his or her designee.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Emergency project" means the removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing material from any facility where such activity must be conducted immediately in order to prevent disruption of a commercial or industrial process or activity or destruction of property.

"Encapsulation" means the process of coating, binding, or resurfacing walls, ceilings, pipes, or other structures with a sealant to prevent friable asbestos from becoming airborne.

"Facility" means any institutional, commercial, or industrial structure, installation, or building, including an apartment building having more than four dwelling units.

"Friable asbestos-containing material" means any material which is applied onto ceilings, walls, structural members, piping, boilers, tanks, pumps, ductwork, or any other part of the building containing more than 1 percent asbestos, by weight, and which when dry may be crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder by hand pressure.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, association, trust, firm, corporation, county, municipality, or other entity, including the state and federal governments.

"Project" means the removal or encapsulation by a contractor of friable asbestos-containing material from any facility or residential dwelling.

"Removal" means the process of taking out, stripping, cleaning up, or disposing friable or potentially friable asbestos-containing materials from any facility or residential dwelling.

"Residential dwelling" means any family residence or apartment building with four or fewer dwelling units.

"Small project" means any asbestos removal or encapsulation project involving less than 160 square feet or 260 linear feet of friable asbestos-containing materials.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, the hyphen was deleted from "naturally occurring" in paragraph (1).

12-12-4. Rules and regulations; schedule of contractor license and project fees.

The board shall have the power to adopt and amend rules and regulations necessary to license contractors, to ensure proper training for asbestos supervisors, and to ensure proper performance of asbestos removal and encapsulating projects and compliance with any provision of this chapter, to implement programs of inspection and enforcement, and to adopt a schedule of contractor license and project fees. The board is expressly empowered to promulgate the rules and regulations consistent with this chapter to ensure the proper performance of asbestos removal and encapsulating projects commenced on and after April 1, 1986.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-5. Powers and duties of director.

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

To collect all fees authorized by this chapter and remit such fees to the state treasury;

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this chapter and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated under this chapter;

To license contractors, and to deny, suspend, or revoke licenses;

To issue all orders and processes as may be necessary to enforce compliance with provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

To conduct such public hearings as are deemed necessary for the proper administration of this chapter;

To make investigations, analyses, and inspections to determine and ensure compliance with this chapter, rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and any orders which the director may issue;

To institute and prosecute such court actions as may be necessary to enforce compliance with any provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter; and

To encourage voluntary cooperation by persons in affected groups to achieve the purpose of this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-6. License requirement; application; renewal; exception.

From and after July 1, 1996, any contractor shall obtain a license as required by rules and regulations established under this chapter prior to engaging in the removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing materials from any facility or residential dwelling in this state. Any contractor holding a valid license on June 30, 1996, shall be considered to hold a valid license until June 30, 1999.

The application for a license or renewal of a license shall be accompanied by an application fee in an amount required by the board which reflects the cost of issuing the license and shall be submitted in such manner, on such forms, and containing such information as the director prescribes.

A license or renewal license shall be issued to an applicant on evidence satisfactory to the director of compliance with this chapter and any rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter. Licenses shall be valid for a period not to exceed three years.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any person who is licensed under Chapter 14 of Title 43 shall be exempt from the licensing and training requirements and other provisions of this chapter when performing asbestos removal or installation which is incidental to the performance of the business or profession for which said person is licensed and when the project involved includes less than:

Ten continuous linear feet of material constructed of asbestos; or

Ten square feet of material constructed of asbestos.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-7. Training requirements.

From and after July 1, 1996, no person may be employed as an asbestos supervisor unless that person has satisfied the training requirements as required by rules and regulations established under this chapter. Any asbestos supervisor holding a valid certificate on June 30, 1996, shall be considered to have satisfied the training requirements as required by rules and regulations established under this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Asbestos removal and encapsulation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Chapter 391-3-14.

12-12-8. Reciprocity.

The director, upon application, may issue a license to any person who holds a license in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, provided that the licensing requirements of asbestos abatement contractors under which the person's license was issued do not conflict with this chapter and are of a standard not lower than that specified by regulation adopted under this chapter; provided, further, that reciprocal privileges are granted to licensed asbestos abatement contractors of this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Asbestos removal and encapsulation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-14.

12-12-9. Denial, revocation, or suspension of license; grounds; review of decision.

The director may refuse to grant a license to an applicant or may revoke or suspend the license of a person licensed by the director for cause, including but not limited to the following:

Making any false statement or giving any false information in connection with an application for license, including an application for renewal;

Violation of this chapter or violation of any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter; or

Failure to demonstrate the qualifications or standards for licensure contained in this chapter or in the rules and regulations of the board. It shall be incumbent upon the applicant to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director that he or she meets all the requirements for licensure; and, if the director is not satisfied as to the applicant's qualifications, he or she shall have the power to deny such licensure.

Review of a decision of the director under this chapter shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-12-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-10. Notice of commencement of project; contents; project fee; certification of completion.

From and after April 1, 1986, no contractor shall engage in a project prior to notifying the director of such activity at least seven calendar days prior to commencement of same. Such prior notice need not be provided for an emergency project; provided, however, that the contractor shall notify the director of the activity within seven calendar days after the commencement of such emergency project. The notification shall be made in the manner and form required by the director and shall be accompanied by a project fee established by the board not to exceed $50.00 for asbestos abatement in a residential dwelling or any small project or $1,000.00 for any other project. The notification shall state the location of the project, the owner's name and address, the expected dates on which the project will begin and end, and any other information as may be required by the director. The contractor shall comply with this chapter, regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and any regulation pertaining to asbestos removal promulgated under Article 1 of Chapter 9 of this title. Upon completion of the project, the contractor shall certify to the director, on forms specified by the director, that the project was conducted in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and Article 1 of Chapter 9 of this title.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 964, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-11. Compliance with chapter required.

It shall be unlawful for any person, acting either as an asbestos supervisor or contractor, to engage in the removal, encapsulation, cleaning, or disposal of friable asbestos-containing materials or conduct quality assurance activities or air sampling in conjunction with such activities, except in such a manner as to conform to and comply with this chapter and all rules, regulations, and orders established under this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-12. Investigation rights of director; contractor to make records available.

The director or his or her authorized employees, upon a presentation of his or her credentials, shall have a right to enter the premises of persons subject to this chapter or premises where a violation of this chapter is reasonably believed to be occurring or about to occur; to investigate, sample, and inspect for compliance with the requirements imposed under this chapter; or to determine whether such a violation or threatened violation exists. A contractor shall make available to the director or his or her authorized representative such records, data, and other information as may be required by this chapter or rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Cooperation between Georgia and other states generally, T. 28, C. 6.

12-12-13. Cease and desist orders.

Whenever the director determines that a person is violating any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation established under this chapter, he or she may issue an order requiring such person to cease and desist such activity within such a period of time as the director deems reasonable.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-14. Injunctions; restraining and other orders.

Whenever in the judgment of the director any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute an unlawful action under this chapter, the director may make application to the superior court of the county in which such person resides or in which jurisdiction is appropriate for an order enjoining such an act or practice or for an order requiring compliance with this chapter. Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-15. Imminent and substantial danger; remedies of director.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director, upon receipt of evidence that a project is presenting an imminent and substantial endangerment to the health of persons, may bring an action as provided in Code Section 12-12-14 to restrain immediately any person causing or contributing to the alleged danger or to take such other action as may be necessary. If it is not practicable to assure prompt protection of the health of persons solely by commencement of such a civil action, the director may issue such orders as may be necessary to protect the health of persons who are or may be affected by such project. Notwithstanding Code Section 12-12-17, such order shall be immediately effective for a period of not more than 48 hours unless the director brings an action under Code Section 12-12-14 before the expiration of such period. Whenever the director brings such an action within such period, such order shall be effective for such a period of time as may be authorized by the court pending litigation or thereafter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-16. Civil penalty for violation; hearing and judicial review; disposition of penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or rules or regulations under this chapter or failing or refusing to comply with any final order issued under this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than $25,000.00 per day. Each day during which the violation or failure continues shall be a separate violation.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rules or regulations under this chapter or has failed or refused to comply with any final order issued under this chapter, he or she may, upon written notice, require a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board to determine whether applicable civil penalties should be imposed. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the director, shall have a right of judicial review as provided in this chapter. Such hearing and judicial review shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

All civil penalties recovered by the director as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the state treasury.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-17. Hearing and judicial review procedure.

All hearings on and judicial review of orders or other administrative enforcement actions of the director under this chapter shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-18. Judgment in accordance with order of director or administrative law judge.

Any order of the director or an administrative law judge issued in accordance with this chapter which is unappealed from or affirmed or modified on appeal or review may be filed by the director by certified copy in the superior court of the county wherein the person resides or, if said person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business or in the county wherein the violation occurred. The court shall then render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be the same, as though said judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-19. Attorney General to provide legal representation.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to provide legal representation to the director in connection with this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-20. Sovereign immunity not waived; legal duties of contractor, project monitor, or asbestos worker not relieved by chapter.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to conflict with rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal Toxic Substances Control Act or the federal Clean Air Act or by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United States Department of Labor pursuant to the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act or by other applicable federal statutes.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

12-12-21. Sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state, the board, or the division. No action shall be brought against the state, the board, the division, or any member, officer, or employee thereof for damages sustained from the improper or unlawful removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing materials from facilities or residential dwellings governed by this chapter. Nothing in this chapter and no order, action, license, or advice of the director, the division, or any representative thereof shall be construed to relieve a contractor, project monitor, or asbestos worker of the legal duties, obligations, or liabilities incident to removal or encapsulation of friable asbestos-containing materials from facilities or residential dwellings.

(Code 1981, §

12-12-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 238, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For comment, "Keeping the Arms in Touch:
Taking Political Accountability Seriously in the Eleventh Amendment Arm of the State Doctrine," see 64 Emory L.J. 819 (2015).